Laurie Mason has been a nurse for nearly 30 years, working in hospitals through some of the busiest flu seasons. But the coronavirus outbreak is something entirely new.

"This is the most serious thing I've been through personally," said Mason, who works in an ambulatory surgery center for BayCare in St. Petersburg.

While health care workers in hospitals across the Tampa Bay area are preparing to identify, diagnose and treat potential patients with coronavirus, they're also hoping to protect themselves from exposure. Gov. Ron DeSantis said this week the state anticipates more cases in Florida after four people tested positive in Hillsborough, Manatee and Santa Rosa counties.

The Florida Department of Health is monitoring 248 people in the state with possible exposure to the virus, known technically as COVID-19. That's down from more than 700 earlier in the week. There are 69 cases with pending test results in Florida right now.

National Nurses United, a large and fast-growing union with 150,000 members, said 80 nurses across the country have been quarantined due to COVID-19 exposure. Some health care workers, like nurses and a physician from Doctors Hospital in Sarasota, are being quarantined after a man in his 60s was diagnosed and is being treated there.

"Registered nurses face the unknown every single day at our facilities, and they are there 24/7," said Bonnie Castillo, a registered nurse in California and executive director of the union. "In many clinics and hospitals, nurses do not have the necessary protective equipment or the education and training."

The union released survey results Thursday from more than 6,500 working nurses across the country which showed they felt unprepared to properly handle the coronavirus outbreak. Only 44 percent said they received education about COVID-19 from their employer and 23 percent responded that they weren't sure if their employer had a plan in place.

"One patient can sideline so many health workers at once," Castillo said. "And once we're quarantined, we're not only prevented from caring for that COVID-19 patient, but also the cancer patients, the cardiac patients and the premature babies."

The union, at a news conference, called for better protections for nurses in American hospitals, including improved screening and testing capacity from the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, and emergency assistance from the Occupational Safety and Health Administration to protect nurses exposed to infectious disease.

Cathy Kennedy is a registered nurse who works in the neonatal intensive care unit at Kaiser Permanente Hospital, where one California patient has died from coronavirus. She said nurses are being given contradictory information.

"Imagine working in a negative pressure room for eight hours, wondering if anyone will get you the resources you need to care for this contagious patient or come to relieve you," she said. "That is the reality that nurses are facing."

Bayfront Health St. Petersburg, which operates a Level 2 trauma center in St. Petersburg and a freestanding emergency department in Pinellas Park, has been closely following the CDC guidelines, said Dr. Traci Ryan, the medical director in Pinellas Park.

"It's a moving target," she said. "Our goal is prevention. We have to keep our health care workers safe in order to prevent spread in the community."

Clinical teams are meeting daily to discuss updates from state and federal agencies, which change quickly and often, Ryan said. But the hospital system has been working for more than a month to get ready.

"We've been steadily preparing for this since the news was coming out of China," Ryan said.

Preparations include making sure protective gear - gowns, gloves, goggles and masks - is available to all clinical staff, said Dr. Jeremy Kirtz, emergency room medial director for AdventHealth Carrollwood and AdventHeath Westchase hospitals.

If patients are suspected to be contagious, and they meet the CDC criteria for potential coronavirus testing, they are put into an isolation room, he said.

"All non-essential staff who don't need to physically examine the patient can communicate with them through a portable phone," Kirtz said. "They don't have to go in the room."

There are three areas of main concern when it comes to preparing for emergency management, said Jay Wolfson, a professor at the University of South Florida's College of Public Health and an expert on health care policy. They are inventory and supply management, staffing appropriately to avoid burnout, and keeping all staff and the community up to date on current outbreak information.

"Given the current shortage of masks and gowns, hospitals are working aggressively with their supply companies to ensure backup inventories," he said.

On Wednesday, the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services announced it intends to purchase 500 million N95 respirators over the next 18 months to help stockpile materials needed to treat patients with COVID-19. But hospital operators still worry about a shortage of needed supplies - including N95 masks in the short term.

"In recent years, 'just-in-time' inventory management had become the standard for maintaining levels of supplies," Wolfson said. "But emergency planning includes advance inventory acquisitions and storage plans. And hospitals in the community are communicating and collaborating with each other."

Florida has learned from hurricane season that advanced staffing plans are important during times of high volume and long-lasting emergency situations, Wolfson said.

"This involves modifying shifts, carefully monitoring staff alertness, resting options and ensuring proper nutrition," he said.

At Bayfront, staff are communicating daily to keep up with how the outbreak continues to change, said Ryan, the emergency department director.

"It's a lot like Hurricane Irma, honestly," she said. "We don't know if it's going to go down the middle, or the left or the right. So we have to prepare for every outcome."

Mason, the nurse from BayCare, said information is constantly flowing on new protocols and updated guidelines. She said she feels that her employer is keeping everyone in the loop, which makes her feel safe.

"We are constantly getting updates about what's going on," she said. "I feel like we are well-equipped to handle what comes next."
 Miami Mayor Francis Suarez has become a national face of everyday life with coronavirus, telling national interviewers he came down with COVID-19 despite not suffering any symptoms.

Which raises the question: How did the mayor of Miami manage to get a COVID-19 test without suffering any symptoms?

Like NBA players and entertainers, elected and appointed leaders in Miami have formed their own subset of prominent people with COVID-19 scares who managed to secure quick test results in the midst of statewide rationing of lab materials needed to detect the deadly virus.

In Miami, not only did Suarez secure state-processed lab results through a test administered by the city. He said dozens of people tied to city government were tested too in a blitz that, according to public statements, included the wives of some Miami commissioners.

"About 40-plus people of our government have been tested, that have been in close proximity or in contact with me," Suarez said during a video diary March 16 as he chronicles his time in self-isolation at home. "I think it's important to share that news with you. So you have confidence there isn't a widespread contagion in our government. And that first responders who come to respond to you are not contagious from the fact that I am contagious."

The broad set of speedy results don't reflect the struggles most people have encountered seeking coronavirus testing across Florida. The latest state figures show fewer than 1,000 tests completed in Miami-Dade, a county with a population of nearly 2.8 million people.

Neena Malik, a Miami psychologist, said occasional chills morphed into coronavirus concerns on St. Patrick's Day, as her fever crept up and flu-like symptoms mounted. The 53-year-old married mother of a 13-year-old said she's been in her bedroom since Wednesday morning as she fended off a fever, broke the troubling news of her symptoms to clients and slowly gave up on trying to get herself tested.

Malik said her doctor's office had a nurse read a prepared message that told her to report to an emergency room if her symptoms got worse. "'You will not be tested. There aren't enough tests," Malik said she was told. A call Friday to a drive-thru testing center brought more bad news. She had the symptoms needed to meet state criteria, but not the history.

"She told me the only people they are testing are the ones who have been personally exposed to someone who has tested positive for COVID-19, plus had symptoms," Malik said. "It's almost impossible, because almost nobody has been tested." (On Saturday afternoon, Malik had an encouraging update. She tried again, and wound up seeing a doctor online through the Baptist system. The physician agreed to a test and now Malik said she has to wait for the results. "They said I should hear from the CDC on 6 to 7 days," she said.)

While state guidelines for COVID-19 tests require contact with a positive case and coronavirus symptoms, Miami confirmed Friday it secured scarce testing for asymptomatic elected officials and administrators based on their government roles.

"The City of Miami, working with the Florida Department of Health, facilitated testing of those internal to our administration that had direct contact with the Mayor as a means to ensure continuity of government and contain any significant spread of the virus," read a statement released Friday.

Suarez's COVID-19 diagnosis sent senior officials home as they waited out potential symptoms after close contact with the mayor. That included Police Chief Jorge Molina.

In the Friday statement, the city said the quick COVID-19 tests were justified to prevent having to consider even more administrators and city employees at risk without knowing whether Suarez's first wave of contacts had the virus.

"The City of Miami experienced a circumstance that is unprecedented and one which, fortunately, no other municipal government has had to deal with to this point," the statement said. "We stand by the decision, as we have an obligation to our residents and property owners to do all we can to keep our government operating at maximum capacity."

Suarez joined Miami-Dade Mayor Carlos Gimenez for a Miami reception with the president of Brazil on March 9, and both had their COVID-19 results back after entering self-isolation when word spread that an aide to President Jair Bolsonaro contracted the virus.

Like the 42-year-old Suarez, Gimenez, 66, reported no symptoms but quickly secured a COVID-19 test and received negative results within hours from a state lab in Miami. Because Gimenez was negative, administration sources said his top aides weren't required to be tested and isolated over potential exposure to him. That spared Miami-Dade the kind of isolation sparked by Suarez's positive test.

Gimenez's office did not respond to a request for information on how the mayor qualified for a test. But Gimenez, whose position puts him in charge of county police, ambulances and ports, seemed to address it in a Twitter post on March 13. "As the incident commander during this and other emergencies," he wrote, "it would have been irresponsible for me not to get tested immediately."

Testing roadblocks didn't prevent Suarez's 70-year-old father, Miami-Dade Commissioner Xavier Suarez, from getting quick results. He described getting tested in the parking lot of a public hospital he helps oversee on the board with control over the tax-funded Jackson Health System.

"Was waiting to [show] results of my CoVid19 until (1) i had good news & (2) the test was available to all Americans," Suarez wrote Friday night, along with a photo of a woman in scrubs, a ventilation mask and face guard holding medical testing material in a parking lot. "My wife & I tested negative! Thanks to Chief JMH emergency nurse Monica Ramage-Suarez, pictured here."

A Jackson spokesman said the hospital network couldn't comment on circumstances around an individual test, given medical confidentiality rules. Suarez, a former Miami mayor himself who's now running to succeed a term-limited Gimenez in 2020, said the quick lab test made sense given the public attention given one of the county's few known COVID-19 cases.

"I assumed as the father of the only identified person in this community of three million people to be infected, and a fairly well known public figure, that testing negative would take pressure off everyone else and reduce community panic and stress," Suarez said in an email response to questions about the test. "I assumed that was the logical priority for testing."

For city officials and others, Miami provided COVID-19 testing March 13 at an outdoor tent assembled by a city training center for firefighters in Coconut Grove. Commissioner Joe Carollo said he was able to go there for a test, as was his wife. Commissioner Manolo Reyes and his wife also received city tests. All came back negative.

Miami's statement didn't address why relatives of commissioners were offered tests, but Carollo said it made sense to quickly get a sense of the exposure from COVID-19 at City Hall.

"This is probably the only city government in America where all your top people were exposed," Carollo said. "If all of us are knocked out, it becomes pretty hard to run the city of Miami."County officials are hoping a new COVID-19 test site set to open next week at the Mahaffey Theater will provide some relief for the growing backlog in coronavirus testing.Pinellas County Commission Chair Pat Gerard said the drive-thru site will be operated by the state, similar to the site at Raymond James Stadium."They finally came through," Gerard said. "We've been asking for months for a testing site from the state. ... For some reason we were overlooked.

Now that our numbers are soaring, they're paying attention."Gerard hopes the site will provide some relief to the rising demand. For now, getting a free test for COVID-19 this week is becoming nearly impossible in Tampa Bay.As of Wednesday morning, multiple testing providers do not have appointments available until next week or a week after.The Pinellas Department of Health, which offers drive-thru testing at multiple locations, could not book an appointment before July 9. The earliest appointment slot in Hillsborough County, which recently expanded to testing more than 1,000 people a day, is July 15.CVS Health only allows people to book three days out, but a check of 27 sites in the Tampa Bay area all yielded the same response: "There are no available times at this location."BayCare Health offers testing on a first-come, first-served basis, but has a limited amount of tests available each day. Officials had to turn cars away from the Tropicana Field testing site after reaching capacity around 8 am. Monday and Tuesday. People started lining up before the sun rose in hopes of securing one of the coveted spots. Wednesday saw some decreased demand, with the site closing as scheduled at 11 a.m."The numbers are going up, people are concerned and they want to get tested," Hillsborough County Commission Chair Les Miller said. "I wish there was more we could do. My concern right now is will we run out of the tests. That's the scary part right now, but it's just the demand."Both Gerard and Miller encouraged people to stay home, wear masks, wash their hands and continue to social distance, especially in light of the inability to schedule a test this week.Cases have spiked in Tampa Bay and Florida throughout much of June, with the state tallying nearly 100,000 new cases in the past month. The past two weeks have seen at least 2,000 cases reported in Florida each day, with a record-setting 9,585 cases Saturday.St. Petersburg Emergency Manager Amber Boulding said the goal is to have the Mahaffey Theater test site open by the end of next week, but stressed that many of the details and logistics are still being finalized.The plan is for drive-thru testing to take place in the parking garage, which provides cover from summer heat and thunder storms, Boulding said.The goal is to conduct about 2,000 tests per day and to expand the hours so that people who work during the day have a chance to get tested in the evening.Similar to the Trop site, testing will be first-come, first-served, not appointment-based, Boulding said."I understand everyone's desperate and they want to be tested," Boulding said. "But we're doing everything in our power to pull the resources together and get it up off the ground by the end of next week."Gov. Ron DeSantis issued a rare Saturday news conference to reassure Floridians about rising cases of COVID-19 in the state, saying that the "vast majority" of new cases are from young people who don't have symptoms of the disease."The disease burden is not as significant as it was in March and April," he said. "Very important to point out. We're in a much better position than we were in March or April."He pointed to low hospitalization rates, increased testing and the median age of a person with COVID-19, which fell to 37 last week. Early in the pandemic, he noted, only people with symptoms could be tested."A case now is a lot different in terms of what it would mean in terms of a case in March," he said.DeSantis held the news conference on another record day of COVID-19 cases in Florida.

The state added 4,049 new cases on Saturday, bringing the overall total to 93,797 total infections since the first recorded case in March.He also urged Floridians to obey social distancing and to wear masks when indoors, blaming news reports from early in the pandemic for confusing people about the necessity of wearing a mask. Health officials initially thought masks would not be effective at preventing spread. Since then, officials have strongly urged the public to wear masks. On Friday, the Florida Medical Association urged local officials to adopt requirements that residents wear masks while in out public."I think there's been a lot of mixed messaging from the public's perspective," DeSantis said.But DeSantis himself often doesn't wear a mask while in public. At Saturday's news conference, neither he nor most members of his staff wore a mask.When asked why his own staff weren't wearing masks on Saturday, DeSantis said they were all obeying social distancing in the room. While some were standing about six feet apart, some weren't, and they didn't obey social distancing before and after the news conference. His staff rarely wears masks during his news conferences in the Capitol.Tampa Mayor Jane Castor instituted a mask order for residents on Friday, but DeSantis has resisted issuing his own statewide order. On Saturday, he said he didn't know how it could be enforced."I think statewide penalties would be problematic for a whole host of reasons," he said. "I think we've just got to trust people, give them opportunity to do good things, make good decisions. I think that tends to work better."The state has tested 1.56 million people since March, which has been sharply increasing in recent weeks. That rise in testing is one major reason for the increase in cases, DeSantis has said.But many experts disagree. The positivity rate of tests in Florida are on the rise. The World Health Organization has said that in countries that have conducted extensive testing for COVID-19, the rate of positive cases should remain at 5% or lower for at least 14 days before loosening social distancing requirements. Over the last 24 hours in Florida, 12.3 percent of the new tests were positive.Yet despite the unmistakable upward trajectory of leading indicators of COVID-19 s toll, DeSantis' outlook remains bullish. He's refused, at least publicly, to reconsider his decision to reopen Florida in phases that relax restrictions he put in place on April 1 when he issued a confusing stay-at-home order.Against the advice of many public health experts, but in keeping with the aims of President Donald Trump, a key ally, DeSantis aggressively pushed to reopen Florida. He began reopening on May 4, allowing restaurants and businesses to open at 25 percent capacity. Barbershops and salons reopened May 11. Gyms reopened May 18. Then, DeSantis announced that bars, theaters, tattoo parlors and bowling alleys could open on June 5. Last week, he helped ensure that the Republican National Convention would be held in Jacksonville in late August.Yet doubts persist that members of the public are taking the necessary precautions as businesses reopen. Videos and photos of crowded bars brimming with patrons not practicing anything resembling social distancing soon cluttered Facebook and Twitter feeds. By early last week, six downtown bars in St. Petersburg announced they were closing because employees had tested positive. Similar closures were announced across the state.All the while, cases mounted. Since the reopening began May 4, Florida's cases have climbed higher and higher. Florida saw 819 new confirmed cases of COVID-19 on the first day of reopening, May 4, which was only 20 percent of what was announced Saturday.DeSantis remains resolute. On Tuesday, he said "we're not rolling back," when asked about the rising cases. To shut down again would bring too much harm, he said."You have to have society function. You have to be able to have a cohesive society. That's the best way to be able to deal with the impacts of the virus," DeSantis said. "To suppress a lot of working age people at this point I don't think would be very effective."Three days later, DeSantis again defended his approach by downplaying the rise in cases by asserting that hospitalizations remain low and the median age of cases continues to trend down. Last week, the median age was 37. He said many of those people are asymptomatic."A new case is just a positive test. It doesn't mean somebody's sick," DeSantis said. "The number of cases is not necessarily something that's going to tell you what the burden of the disease is."Throughout the crisis, DeSantis has, sometimes misleadingly, stated that coronavivrus poses no threat to young people."This particular pandemic is one where I don't think nationwide, there's been a single fatality under 25," DeSantis said during an April 9 meeting to discuss reopening Florida schools. "For whatever reason, it just doesn't seem to threaten kids."At the time he said that, Florida hadn't yet reported any deaths of COVID-19 patients under the age of 25, but several Americans in that age group have been killed by the virus.Without acknowledging that he had misspoken, DeSantis then asserted more clearly that no one in under 25 in Florida had died.Since then, three people statewide under 24 have died from COVID-19, the respiratory illness causes by the virus. But on Saturday, a new milestone was reached.A 17-year-old boy in Pasco County died, the state's first fatality for someone under 18.On Saturday, DeSantis didn't acknowledge the death. Instead, he continued with his message that young people aren't at risk."In those younger groups" who have tested postitive, DeSantis said, "it's almost always asymptomatic."· · ·
Social media feeds and newscasts have recently played host to numerous examples of public anger over protective measures aimed at slowing the spread of the novel coronavirus, or COVID-19. From viral videos of citizens angry about requirements to wear face coverings, to armed protesters demanding states reopen non-essential businesses, these anecdotes suggest that there is widespread opposition to mitigation efforts. Such stories have been boosted by viral disinformation aimed at sowing deeper divisions. There is another story, however, of an overwhelming and largely unheard majority of Floridians.Even in the face of significant economic hardships, Floridians overwhelmingly support efforts to slow the spread of COVID-19. Recently, the University of South Florida and Nielsen partnered to launch a COVID-19 focused edition of the Sunshine State Survey. The representative survey of 600 Floridians examined attitudes and opinions on the coronavirus outbreak as well as state and local responses to the crisis. We found a public concerned about the health situation and overwhelmingly supportive of mitigation measures despite facing economic hardships.

First, the USF-Nielsen survey showed widespread public concern over the future health effects of COVID-19. More than half of all respondents surveyed (52.2%) indicated that they were concerned about contracting the virus, while just over three-fourths expressed concern that someone they knew would fall ill in the next three months (76.6%). Such attitudes illustrate that swift moves to reopen businesses and recreational areas may not be met by a public willing to take on increased health risks.

These concerns may help to explain why Floridians overwhelmingly support state and local efforts to limit the spread of the virus.The survey showed that healthy majorities of the public-regardless of political partisanship-support mitigation measures designed to slow the virus's spread. In particular, a strong majority of individuals participating in the survey indicated their support for the state limiting public gatherings (94.3%), closing restaurants and bars (88.9%), limiting gatherings in houses of worship (87.4%), and closing parks and beaches (81.6%). Sizeable majorities even favored instituting nightly curfews (62.9%) and the issuance of fines for those who violate stay-at-home orders (62.2%).Despite facial covering requirements becoming a flashpoint in some areas, such attitudes are not widely represented in the data. Four in 5 Floridians (79.3%) would support a statewide measure requiring individuals to wear face masks in public. With the possibility for future viral waves in the summer and fall, state and local leaders have public support to make the decisions necessary to protect Florida.

Second, our data reveal that such public policy support comes at a great cost. In the process of containing and mitigating the spread of COVID-19, government leaders also must acknowledge and attempt to mitigate the economic sacrifices many individuals are making.According to the survey responses, roughly two-thirds of the state's households have experienced at least some level of income loss and work disruption as a result of the coronavirus situation. More than 15% of households have seen at least one individual file for unemployment benefits since the start of the public health crisis. Similarly, a quarter of all households (26.6%) reported at least some cut in hours, and 17.9% have experienced temporary furloughs. Given these sacrifices, it's unsurprising that more than 60% of survey respondents expressed concern over their ability to meet their financial obligations over the next three months.

Finally, amid widespread health and economic impacts, Floridians showed strong support for state and local responses to the pandemic. A majority of individuals surveyed (51.5%) indicated that they approve of the state government's response, and more than two-thirds (68.8%) approved of their local government's response.Certainly, public sentiment will evolve on these matters. However, the subdued nature of calls to reopen in Florida, even in the short time since this survey was fielded, suggest that these attitudes continue to dominate. For the moment, Florida's state and local leaders seem to enjoy broad public support. The extent to which that support endures may hinge on how well government leaders recognize and seek to prioritize the legitimate long-term health and economic concerns of individuals. Both public health and economic life can be protected.The next few months will test the public, policy leaders, and those professionals who report information to the public. These survey results illustrate that the loudest voices in our social media feeds and news stories are sometimes not representative of the broader public. And the public's well-placed health and economic concerns should serve as a stark reminder of the enormous personal and professional sacrifices being made by Floridians in the face of COVID-19.
As the state struggles with a dramatic spike in COVID-19 cases, it's also contending with criticism from the woman who designed the state's public display of COVID-19 data, Rebekah Jones.Jones was unceremoniously fired after claiming her supervisors were trying to make her manipulate data.Rather than go away quietly, Jones designed her own competing dashboard, one that draws upon state data but offers an expanded menu of metrics, including hospital bed availability by facility, a key number, especially now as the number of confirmed cases soars. She says the state continues in its effort to twist the COVID-19 data for political reasons.In a tweetstorm Tuesday night, Jones informed her nearly 42,000 followers that multiple health department sources have told her staff is being asked to "change the numbers and begin slowly deleting deaths and cases so it looks like Florida is improving next week in the leadup to July 4, like they've 'made it over the hump.' ""I've independently verified they've deleted at least 1200 cases in the last week."That earned her an invitation to be interviewed on CNN's morning show, "New Day," Wednesday morning. Asked for evidence to back up her claim, Jones appeared to mute her criticism, indicating her main issue with the state's numbers is that the official tally doesn't count out-of-state residents who die of COVID-19 in Florida.That's a disparity that has been pointed out by many, but it is not the same as "deleting deaths."Jones did not respond to requests for comment Tuesday.Florida Gov.

Ron DeSantis was asked about Jones' latest broadsides at a news conference Wednesday afternoon."You're embarrassing yourself," the governor said, accusing the Miami Herald of "chasing the conspiracy bandwagon."Later Wednesday, Jones discussed her concerns on WLRN's Sundial program, expressing concerns that if the state were to alter numbers ahead of the July 4 weekend, it could give Florida residents false confidence about the current danger posed by COVID-19."That could cost a lot of lives," she said.The Herald has questioned the state numerous times about apparent inconsistencies with the data it has released. Earlier this week, for example, a news release from the Florida Division of Emergency Management cited a different count for the number of new COVID-19 cases in the state on June 22 than the state's dashboard.Alberto Moscoso, a spokesman for the Department of Health, said that the state had previously produced two different numbers each day, reflecting different time periods, but would report only one of the two numbers going forward.Previously the Herald asked Moscoso about wild fluctuations in COVID-19 case counts at long-term care facilities over the course of a few day and was given little explanation for the variation.The data on COVID-19 cases, deaths and testing in long-term care facilities was released only in response to pressure, including a lawsuit filed by the Herald and several other news organizations.Since announcing its first positive case of coronavirus in Florida on March 1 - after weeks of tracking suspected cases but not telling local hospitals, much less the public - the state has generated voluminous data, much of it displayed on the public dashboard that is updated daily.Jones, the geographic information system manager for DOH's Division of Disease Control and Health Protection, caused a storm last month after multiple media outlets published an email she wrote that stated authority over the dashboard had been taken away from her office. The sharply worded email, shared with the Herald by a recipient of the message, was addressed to users of the state's data portal, which includes researchers and journalists. It was not clear who replaced her.In that and other emails, she appears to be instructed to not just revoke access to certain data, but to take down the whole site because it provided access to the data."This whole site needs to come down," Scott Pritchard wrote in one of the emails Jones provided. "It literally has all the data files."She was fired for insubordination.Pritchard was the state's Interim director of infectious disease prevention and investigations section in the Bureau of Epidemiology's Division of Disease Control and Health Protection, most recently leading a team of epidemiologists involved in the COVID-19 response, according to the Department of Health.After 15 years of service, he left his role at the department in June. Moscoso, the DOH spokesman, said Pritchard "decided to resign to pursue other professional goals."Pritchard, who according to his Facebook is on a cross-country road trip, did not return a request for comment."Scott has a very strong work ethic, is creative in his approach to epidemiology, and sets high standards for himself and also for the people around him," said Richard Hopkins, a former colleague at DOH. "He has - or used to have - very little tolerance for excuses."Jones has raised more than $183,000 on a GoFundMe website for her rival dashboard, where she says the data will not be "fudged." The new dashboard, which she calls Florida COVID Action, looks a lot like the state health department's and draws upon state data, but has some differences.For one, it shows which Florida counties are ready for the next phase of reopening (she reports only three are). It also highlights the number of intensive care unit beds available across the state and provides information on testing locations across the state.Jones includes extensive documentation for each element of her dashboard and explains how her data presentation and calculations differ from those provided by DOH. Jones includes positive antibody tests in her total number of cases, for example.The Heraldwas unable to independently verify her claim that 1,200 cases had been deleted by DOH in the last week. The Herald compared DOH case line data published on June 21 and June 22 to look for discrepancies in cases. For cases dated March 1 through June 20, the Herald analysis showed 10 cases appeared to have been dropped from one data publication to the next. All of those cases were from June.Speaking on WLRN, Jones said that former colleagues she remains in contact with at DOH tell her they are regularly asked to manipulate data to make Florida's numbers look better."Every day," she said.She said she has preserved thousands of pages of e-mails and other documents and has been in contact with numerous lawmakers, including Florida Agriculture Commissioner Nikki Fried, investigating her claims."There are definitely receipts and they will be made public," she said.· · ·Florida is closing in on almost 200 deaths from the coronavirus, with the state Department of Health reporting an additional 25 deaths on Saturday alone.

Those deaths came from areas around Broward, Dade, Monroe, and Palm Beach counties - far south of the Tampa Bay area, which reported no new deaths.

In all, Florida has seen 195 people succumb to COVID-19, the severe and sometimes fatal respiratory disease caused by the strand of coronavirus that has swept the globe. It's a staggering spike from the 56 deaths attributed to the virus just one week ago - accounting for a 248 percent increase.

After a week that saw Florida surpass 10,000 confirmed coronavirus cases, a resurgence of testing saw an additional 1,277 come back positive for the virus on Saturday, according to the state's Department of Health. That brings the state's total number of positive coronavirus cases to 11,545. The single day increase marked a 12.4 percent rise in cases and a 14.7 percent jump in deaths statewide.

The number of positive coronavirus patients continues to surge in the southern parts of the state, with Miami-Dade County leading the state with 3,890 positive cases and 243 hospitalizations. Yet an influx of much-needed testing equipment has also sparked a surge of positive cases identified in the Tampa Bay area. Hillsborough, Pasco, Pinellas, Hernando, Citrus and Manatee counties accounted for 1,132 cases as of Saturday.

While Florida's testing has increased over the past week, the percent of those testing positive for COVID-19 overall is 11 percent. Of the 11,725 tests performed on April 3, there were 1,597 positive results, or 14 percent.

The number of positive patients in Hillsborough County is now 497, the fifth highest total of all 67 counties in the state, according to the Department of Health. Pinellas County, which currently counts 342 positive COVID-19 patients, saw the largest local increase Saturday with 24 new cases, including a detention deputy at the Pinellas County Jail.

The deputy last worked at the jail on March 19, 2020, and the Florida Department of Health identified two days of concern where the deputy could have spread the virus, Pinellas County Sheriff Bob Gualtieri said. All inmates and staff who came in contact with the deputy during those two days have been cleared by the county's branch of the Department of Health after testing negative for the virus.

"The deputy is recovering and will remain out of work for the foreseeable future," a statement from the Sheriff's office said. "There is no indication anyone else at the jail is at risk."

The state's Department of Corrections reported on Saturday the first case of a prison inmate contracting the virus. There was little information available about the case by Saturday evening, but the department did report that the inmate is located at Blackwater River Correctional Facility, a privately-operated prison in Milton, Fla. owned by The Geo Group Inc.

Pinellas County has seen seven people die after contracting COVID-19, compared to five in Hillsborough and two in Pasco. Pasco County has reported 90 positive cases and 18 hospitalizations to the Department of Health and Hernando reported 40 cases, eight hospitalizations and, thus far, no deaths.

To the south, Manatee County has reported 129 coronavirus cases, 28 hospitalizations and three deaths.

The climb in cases is familiar news by now, a combination of factors including expanded testing in the last week - Florida tallied more than 15,000 tests in just the last day - and continual community spread.

More than 107,300 tests have been conducted, with about 10.8 percent returning positive. Gov. Ron DeSantis touted in a news release Saturday night that Florida now ranks second only to New York in the nation in terms of the number of tests administered.

Tests have largely been given to people experiencing more serious symptoms. Many people with milder cases, or without symptoms, have not been able to see if they are carriers of the virus, even if they believe they contracted it.

And the state has not yet released data on people who tested positive but got better. The governor has said he is asking about that data himself.

The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention announced new federal guidelines Friday recommending that all Americans cover their faces in public, especially in areas hit hard by the spread of the virus. The CDC recommends non-medical masks or makeshift coverings - such as scarves, T-shirts or bandannas - that protect the nose and mouth.

Dr. Douglas Holt, Director of the Health Department's Hillsborough County office, told the county's Emergency Policy Group this week that the number of patients testing positive for COVID-19 appears to be doubling every six days. Last week, health officials reported an average of 15 new coronavirus cases every day, Holt said. This week, the average is closer to 30 cases each day.

"The COVID-19 virus is demonstrating it's much more insidious and contagious in its transmission prior to any illness occurring," Holt said.

Hillsborough County's hospitals are currently in possession of 224 ventilators, Holt said, and his office is expecting a shipment of 500 additional ventilators from the state. The county also received an additional 1,000 test collection kits, putting the current supply of available tests at more than 2,000.

That should allow the county to continue collecting samples from suspected COVID-19 patients through next Wednesday, said Director of Emergency Operations Tim Dudley. The biggest hurdle now facing county health officials is the turnaround time for getting back results.

Tampa General Hospital is now able to return test results within 24 hours - by far the fastest turnaround in the county. But the hospital is also extremely limited in the number of patients it can test, Dudley said. The county's Department of Health outfit can produce results within 48 hours, but with a growing backlog at the state testing centers most are still being sent to Quest Diagnostic and LabCorp, which is returning results anywhere from 5 to 7 days later.

Reports of recovery from serious illness caused by the coronavirus have been trickling in from around the world.

Physicians are swapping anecdotes on social media: a 38-year-old man who went home after three weeks at the Cleveland Clinic, including 10 days in intensive care. A 93-year-old woman in New Orleans whose breathing tube was removed, successfully, after three days. A patient at Massachusetts General Hospital who was taken off a ventilator after five days and was doing well.

"Patients are definitely recovering from Covid-19 ARDS (acute respiratory distress syndrome) and coming off vents," Dr. Theodore "Jack" Iwashyna, a professor of pulmonary and critical care medicine at the University of Michigan, wrote on Twitter recently.

MORE ON CORONAVIRUS:Tampa Bay health workers feel pain as virus saps hospital budgets

But the outlook for older adults, who account for a disproportionate share of critically ill COVID-19 patients, is not encouraging. Advanced age is associated with significantly worse outcomes for older patients, and even those who survive are unlikely to return to their previous level of functioning.

According to a new study in The Lancet based on data from China, the overall death rate for people diagnosed with coronavirus is 1.4 percent. But that rises to 4 percent for those in their 60s, 8.6 percent for people in their 70s and 13.4 percent for those age 80 and older.

How often do people who are critically ill recover? According to a report from Britain out last week, of 775 patients with COVID-19 admitted to critical care, 79 died, 86 survived and were discharged to another location, and 609 were still being treated in critical care, with uncertain futures. Experts note this is preliminary data, before a surge of patients expected over the next several weeks.

ALSO READ:The latest data: How coronavirus in Florida is trending right now

According to a just-published small study of 24 critically ill COVID-19 patients treated in Seattle hospitals, 50 percent died within 18 days. (Four of the 12 who died had a do-not-resuscitate order in place.) Of those who survived, three remained on ventilators in intensive care units, four left the ICU but stayed in the hospital, and five were discharged home. The study appeared in the New England Journal of Medicine.

What does recovery from COVID-19 look like? I asked Dr. Kenneth Lyn-Kew, an associate professor of pulmonology and critical care medicine at National Jewish Health in Denver, named the No.1 respiratory hospital in the nation last year by U.S. News & World Report. Our conversation has been edited for length and clarity.

Q: What's known about recovery?

It's helpful to think about mild, moderate and severe disease. Most people, upwards of 80 percent, will have mild symptoms. Their recovery typically takes a couple of weeks. They might feel horrible, profoundly fatigued, with muscle aches, a bad cough, a fever and chest discomfort. Then, that goes away. Also, there are some people who never have symptoms, who never even know they had it.

Q: What about people with moderate illness?

Because we're so early into this, we have less information about these patients. Often, they spend a few days in the hospital. People feel more short of breath: Sometimes, an underlying condition like asthma is exacerbated. Typically, they need a bit of oxygen for a few days.

Also, there are patients who have high fevers or severe diarrheal illness with COVID-19. Those patients can get dehydrated and need IV fluids.

There also appears to be a small population of people who can develop myocarditis inflammation of the heart. They come in with symptoms that mimic heart attacks.

Q: How long do these patients stay hospitalized?

It can vary. Some people get a little oxygen and IV fluid and leave the hospital after two to three days. Some of these moderate patients start to look a little better, then all of a sudden get a lot worse and decompensate.

Q: What about patients with serious illness?

Many of the sickest patients have acute respiratory distress syndrome (ARDS, a disease that floods the lungs with fluid and deprives people of oxygen). These are the patients who end up on mechanical ventilators.

Those least likely to recover seem to be frail older patients with other preexisting illnesses such as COPD [chronic obstructive pulmonary disease] or heart disease. But there's no guarantee that a young person who gets ARDS will recover.

ARDS mortality is usually between 30 percent and 40 percent. But if you break that down, people who have ARDS due to trauma - for instance, car accidents tend to have lower death rates than people who have ARDS due to infection. For older people, who tend to have more infections, mortality rates are much higher - up to 60 percent. But this isn't COVID-specific data. We still have a lot to learn about that.

Q: If someone is sick enough to need ventilation, what's involved?

People usually need a couple of weeks of mechanical ventilation.

Ventilation is very uncomfortable for many people and they end up on medication to make them more comfortable. For some people, just a bit of medication is enough.

Other people require heavier doses of medications such as narcotics, propofol, benzodiazepines or Precedex (a sedative). Because they act on your brain, these medications can induce delirium [a sudden, serious alteration in thinking and awareness]. We really try to minimize that because delirium has a significant impact on a person's recovery.

Being on more medication affects other things also: a patient's sleep-wake cycle. Their mobility, which can make them weaker. It can slow down their gastrointestinal tract so they don't tolerate nutrition as well and get suboptimal nutrition. Many of these patients end up having PTSD [post-traumatic stress disorder] and impaired concentration afterwards.

Q: When can someone go off a respirator?

There are three criteria. They have to be awake enough to protect their swallowing mechanism and their airway. They have to have a low enough need for oxygen that I can support that with something else, such as nasal prongs. And they have to be able to clear enough carbon dioxide.

Q: What will a patient look like at the end of those two weeks?

That depends. If we're able to do everything right, these people are up and walking around with the ventilator. Those patients come out on the other end looking pretty good. Maybe they'll have some weakness, some weight loss, a little PTSD.

The patients who are sicker and more intolerant of the technology, they tend to come out weak, forgetful, confused, deconditioned, maybe not even able to get out of bed. Sometimes, in spite of our best efforts, they'll have skin wounds.

Some of these patients have significant lung fibrosis scarring of the lungs and reduced lung function. This might be a short-term part of their recovery or it could be long-term.

Q: Are there special considerations for older adults?

Older adults tend to have more preexisting illnesses that put them at more risk for complications. Their immune system is less robust. They're more prone to secondary infections such as pneumonia in spite of everything we do to prevent that.

Frailty is an important factor as well. If you come in frail and weak, you have less reserve to fight this through.

Q: When are people ready to be discharged?

You can go home on supplemental oxygen if you still need that kind of assistance. But you need to be able to feed yourself and move around or, if you have more disability, have someone to provide that for you.

Some people spend a couple of weeks in the ICU, then two to three days on a medical/surgical ward. Other people take another week or two to regain some strength. Some will go to an acute rehabilitation facility to get rehab three times a day. Others can go to a skilled nursing facility, where they'll get rehab over a couple of months and then go home.

Q:Who's unlikely to recover?

That we just don't know yet. When we sit down after all this and look at everything afterwards, we can pull up those patterns.

In the ideal world, I wish I could predict who would do well and who wouldn't, so I could talk to them and their family and have an honest conversation.

Q: Are other factors complicating recovery?

With such a high number of sick people, it's harder to do things to maximize recovery, such as bringing in physical therapy and occupational therapy. People aren't able to get as much therapy because there are only so many therapists and some hospitals are limiting who can come in.

COVID-19 is really a nasty disease because of its infectiousness. It isolates people from a lot of things they need to get better - perhaps, most importantly, their family, whose support is really critical along with all the other things I've talked about here.To Robyn Sosna, the doctor couldn't have been more clear.

The discharge paperwork from Oak Hill Hospital in Brooksville had a bolded line: "Coronavirus, COVID-19, Suspected." Below, it said, "You have symptoms related to COVID-19 and the diagnostic test results are not yet ready."

Sosna, 58, had stepped off a cruise ship at Port Tampa Bay on March 7, coughing and fatigued. She has a chronic condition, lupus. The hospital didn't have the capability to test her, she said, so the doctor told her to go to the health department in Hernando County.

But Sosna was never tested.

At the local office a few days later, she said, a worker told her she was not eligible because she did not have a fever, Tylenol having suppressed her temperature.

"I was a cross between crying and pissed off," Sosna said. "I was just done."

She stayed in her bedroom in Spring Hill for the next two weeks, barely able to lift a cup of water. Her husband left food and drinks on the back deck, where she had access through a private door. They were afraid to be close. Sosna's breathing was shallow and sharp.

"It feels like there's glass in my muscles and my joints," she remembers thinking. She had vivid dreams where people talked about her dying. The days blurred. She slept all the time.

Sosna was convinced she had coronavirus.

"Take the worst flu you've ever had and magnify it by about a thousand, and that's what your body feels like," she said.

Nearly three weeks after her attempt to get tested, her strength is starting to come back. But Sosna struggles with a new concern that she'll miss out on future care because COVID-19 is not part of her medical record. What if former patients need a booster shot? What if there's a long-term issue? Sosna's brain feels sluggish, thoughts slow to become actions.

The worry places her at yet another precarious point of the United States' lack of testing for the disease. Ailing people have reported being brushed aside as ineligible for tests, while elected leaders and top doctors admit they have no idea how widespread the pandemic is.

As the illness locks up American life, scientists are trying to develop a new test for people like Sosna - to help confirm or dispel diagnoses they largely made for themselves - and to retroactively measure just how much of the country has been sick this whole time.

· · ·

The limited test kits used to-date allow doctors to check if the coronavirus is inside a person right now.

What Sosna needs is something called a serological test, to look for the presence of antibodies, which the body amasses to fight an infection, and which linger as a sign of past sickness and defense against future disease.

Such tests are common for other viruses, including hepatitis, said Dr. Marissa Levine, director of the Center for Leadership in Public Health Practice at the University of South Florida.

The U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention says it is "working to develop" a serological test for COVID-19 "to assist with efforts to determine how much of the U.S. population has been exposed." The agency did not respond to questions. On its website, the CDC says "antibody test results are important in detecting infections with few or no symptoms."

It could also help Sosna. "She's not out of luck," Levine said.

Antibody tests would improve understanding of the disease across the United States. For one, more people could be tested, experts say, allowing health professionals to better calculate key figures like mortality rates.

Much about this specific coronavirus remains unknown, including what happens to patients long term, said Dr. Gigi Kwik Gronvall, a senior scholar at the Johns Hopkins Center for Health Security. People who recover from more well-known viruses gain immunity for a couple of years in some cases and even longer in others. It's not yet clear what immunity will look like for COVID-19 survivors, but a serological test could help doctors and policymakers identify who has resistance to the disease, and thus could potentially go back to work more easily and help with the response.

Roughly a couple dozen companies are trying to create antibody tests for the United States, Gronvall said. They could work like blood tests in yearly checkups. Dr. Deborah Birx, the coronavirus response coordinator for the White House, said in a recent briefing that officials hope to make a test that requires only a finger-prick. The Icahn School of Medicine at Mount Sinai earlier this month announced researchers had developed a potential antibody test.

"There's a lot of things in this pandemic that have not gone the way they should," Gronvall said, "but the science has been blazing fast."

· · ·

In Spring Hill last week Robyn Sosna cleaned the dishes. She found herself "huffing and puffing."

She has wondered if any other passengers on her cruise to the Bahamas felt sick. She and her daughter wore gloves in the dining area and sanitized their room frequently. Her daughter has not fallen ill.

Testing has expanded, with private labs and hospitals supplementing the state. But capacity is still far short of demand.

Where Sosna lives, "if an individual suspects that he or she needs testing for COVID-19, they are urged to contact their health care provider or the Department of Health," said Ashley Thomas, spokeswoman for the Florida Department of Health in Hernando County. A doctor can collect a sample or provide a written order for the person to be tested somewhere else.

At Oak Hill Hospital, doctors "follow the CDC and Florida Department of Health criteria for ordering COVID-19 tests," said Debra McKell, marketing director for HCA West Florida Division. "Actual testing is done by FDOH and commercial labs."

Under Florida's guidelines as of March 15, someone with a fever, cough or shortness of breath and who recently returned from a cruise should be tested.

Sosna is following news updates as the state's caseload shoots higher. She calls the numbers "BS." Hernando County had reported 20 positive cases of coronavirus as of Monday morning, with 248 people tested.

None of them was her.

Florida is significantly under-reporting the state's COVID-19 testing backlog, a blind spot in the data that could obscure the pandemic's size and hamper efforts to decide when it's safe to end restrictions such as social distancing - even as Gov. Ron DeSantis touts the state's transparency when it comes to coronavirus.

On its public website, the Florida Department of Health says about 1,400 people statewide are waiting for their test results. But that's an undercount, the department acknowledged in response to questions from the Miami Herald. And it's likely a massive one.

That's because the state only reports the number of Floridians waiting to hear back from state labs, not private ones - and those private labs are completing more than 90% of Florida's tests. The state website doesn't say that its figures exclude the vast majority of pending tests for the novel coronavirus.

Two small, private South Florida healthcare providers told theHerald this week that they are awaiting COVID-19 test results for almost 800 patients. That number alone would increase the state's official count of backlogged tests by more than 50%.

Not having the results from the backlog of testing means state officials can't get a real-time picture of how deeply the disease has penetrated the population and when people might have hope of resuming their lives and getting back to work, said Arthur Caplan, professor of bioethics at New York University Langone Medical Center.

"The key to ending the quarantining and social isolation is accurate information about where testing is, how fast we can expect tests to clear, and ultimately how fast we can expect to have a lot of testing," Caplan said. "If the backlog gets enormous, then the public needs to know."

In addition, by not acknowledging delays, the state may escape public pressure to resolve the backlog quickly. And there are other costs. People who are sick may still spread the disease without knowing it. Researchers and officials have less information to track infection patterns. Medical workers have to waste scarce personal protective equipment because they don't know for sure who can expose them.

For epidemiologists, a backlog of tests means they cannot get a timely understanding of infection rates that help them predict when the peak is coming and when the disease is waning, said Derek Cummings, a biology professor with the University of Florida's Emerging Pathogens Institute. Knowing how many people are waiting for tests is important information.

"If you have disruptions to testing and you have backlogs ... that obscures your view of how fast cases are growing and declining," Cummings said.

In a statement to the Herald, Florida's DOH said it was "not accurate" to call the number of people awaiting test results from Florida's state labs a backlog.

"Awaiting testing represents the number of individuals for whom a test has been ordered but have not yet received results, including those who have not yet had their specimens collected for laboratory testing," the department said. "There is no backlog currently associated with Department-coordinated COVID-19 testing efforts."

The state health department did not answer questions about why it isn't including the backlog of tests from private labs in its official count.

Florida contracts with commercial laboratories to process COVID-19 tests, and the state can request information on pending tests from those vendors. That means the state could be providing a fuller picture of the backlog. (The health department has refused to provide copies of the contracts to the Herald despite repeated requests since March 21.)

Private healthcare providers in South Florida say they have hundreds of cases awaiting results - a delay not being captured in state data.

On Friday, when the state health department said people in Miami-Dade and Monroe counties were waiting for results in 326 cases, a single provider in those counties, Community Health of South Florida, told the Herald it had more than 400 patients who haven't been told if they're infected or not.

Another provider, Larkin Community Hospital, said 392 of its patients haven't gotten their results yet.

That's almost 800 cases without results just from Community Health and Larkin - small players compared to South Florida's biggest hospitals, many of whom are also doing testing but refusing to provide data to the Herald. (The private lab Quest Diagnostics processes tests for Community Health. Larkin processes tests at its own lab and also sends samples to a private lab in New Jersey.)

In many ways, Caplan said, testing data is as important to get right as the number of hospitalizations and deaths resulting from COVID-19, the disease caused by the coronavirus.

"It tells us what the risks are to hospital workers and what the general incidence is of who survived," he said.

Open data

Earlier this week, DeSantis praised the way the state is keeping the public informed.

"If you look at the report that the state Department of Health puts out, I challenge you to find another state that's even close with transparency," he said. "We have a dashboard that's up. You can see in real time as the cases come in. When our numbers come in, those are fresh. Some of these other states, those are 48 hours old. We're doing it fresh."

He's right that Florida is releasing far more data than many other states.

But not all data represents the full picture.

The state's daily report says about 166,000 people in Florida have been tested by both state and private labs. It says nearly 18,000 have tested positive for COVID-19, with a handful of tests considered inconclusive and the vast majority negative. And it pegs the backlog at just those 1,400 people.

The site doesn't say that the 1,400 "pending results" are only from state labs. It doesn't specify - until you read another 20 pages into the report - that state labs have done just 14,080 tests so far, or 8 percent of the total. And it doesn't give any number at all for the pending results from the far greater number of tests being conducted by private labs.

Caplan, the NYU bioethicist, called the lack of full and clear information on the state-run website "unethical and a betrayal of trust to the public that they're supposed to serve."

"The public needs up-to-date information on what's going on," he said. "By playing games with the numbers, the state isn't giving an accurate picture and it knows it."

The Herald tried independently to build a picture of Florida's backlog.

But taxpayer-funded systems like Jackson Health, Memorial Healthcare and Broward Health would not say how many of their patients are waiting on results. And Quest, the nation's biggest private lab, is not releasing state-level data, although it has disclosed 80,000 tests pending at the national level. Its major competitor, LabCorp, says it has no backlog.

Unlike Florida, California does disclose its testing backlog for both public and private labs. Earlier this month, the state reported 59,500 people were awaiting test results, leading Gov. Gavin Newsom to apologize.

"All of that frustrating you [is] certainly frustrating me," Newsom said. "The testing space has been a challenging one for us, and I own that, and I have a responsibility as your governor to do better, and to do more testing in the state of California."

The state has since cut its testing backlog by two-thirds.

Living in the dark

Susan Somers waited eight days for her test results after visiting a drive-through site at Marlins Park. Somers was told it would take no more than five days. She repeatedly called the private lab handling her case but only got voicemail - and that was full. She's had serious flu-like symptoms and shortness of breath for weeks.

"I'm feeling frustration, anger and fright. I don't know if I'm positive or negative or if I'm going to end up in the hospital," said Somers, an attorney. "What if I have something else?"

Because her test didn't go to a state lab, she wasn't counted in state figures as someone waiting for results.

Measuring Florida's testing backlog will be difficult without more transparency.

Spokespeople for Jackson and Memorial said reporters could put in public records requests if they wanted to know how many of their patients are awaiting testing results. That could take days or weeks. They would not comment on why they would not immediately release information considered a public record under state law. Broward Health did not respond with data by deadline.

Private hospitals including Baptist Health South Florida, Mount Sinai Medical Center in Miami Beach, HCA and Tenet hospitals - Aventura Medical Center, Kendall Regional Medical Center, Palmetto, Hialeah and Mercy - all declined to provide backlog data. The University of Miami did not respond.

In addition, the Herald tried without success to get numbers from Tampa General Hospital, AdventHealth Orlando, and the University of Florida Health Shands Hospital in Gainesville.

Healthcare institutions in at least one part of Florida aretalking.

Lakeland Regional Health and BayCare told the Lakeland Ledger in Polk County that they had tested a total of 1,137 people for COVID-19 by March 31. At that time, 757 were still waiting for test results, the hospitals said. That was more than 20 times the figure provided by DOH for the county.

Somers finally got her test back on the eighth day of waiting.

The results? Inconclusive.

"They won't retest me," Somers said. "I'll have to call my doctor and find out what she can do."Last month, the Department of Homeland Security deemed farmworkers across the country to be "essential workers"-now, the federal government wants to cut many of their wages. Farmworkers are a uniquely vulnerable population that I have had the opportunity to care for in medical school. Inadequate housing, food insecurity and poor access to healthcare make these proposed wage cuts not only morally wrong, but also dangerous for everyone. If the administration moves forward with this idea, Florida policymakers must be prepared to support farmworkers in order to secure our food supply chain and the health of the state.Farmworker housing is inexcusably unsafe-especially during a pandemic. In Immokalee, I've walked through houses where 20 farmworkers and family members-including young children-crowd into dim and damp rooms, with each individual only guaranteed 50 square feet to themselves. Farmworker surveys show that this is the norm. One only has to look to recentreporting on migrant worker health in Singapore to see what is coming. This is how COVID-19 spreads.

Last year, I cared for a 40-year-old farmworker with uncontrolled diabetes driven by food insecurity (lacking enough food to lead an active, healthy life).Numerous studies show that two out of three farmworkers are food insecure. Meaning, the person who picks tomatoes off the plant to give us a full plate, usually does not have enough food to feed her family. And it is well established that food insecurity increases the odds of both diabetes and hypertension, conditions that put someone at risk of the worst forms of COVID-19. This is how COVID-19 becomes severe.I've watched doctors in a farmworker clinic call colleagues in areas with more advanced equipment to see if anyone could operate on a patient with advanced vascular disease. The most recent National Agricultural Workers Survey showed that over half of all farmworkers have no health insurance. When they do become sick with COVID-19, farmworkers will be forced into cities to receive care, where health systems are already overwhelmed. This is how COVID-19 explodes.Greater economic insecurity for farmworkers will exacerbate all of these circumstances-they will live day-to-day instead of week-to-week. Those who are food insecure will be driven into severe food insecurity, thereby increasing rates of diabetes and hypertension. And any fraction of affordable healthcare will be out of reach.The income of farmers is important, but instead of snatching from the pockets of our most vulnerable, we should look to other parts of the food supply chain to fill this gap. For example, large grocery stores are doing particularly well during this unprecedented time-they could increase pay for farm products without risking the security of their employees. If there is any change to farmworker wages, it should be a significant increase as they continue performing backbreaking work. In addition, farmworkers should receive personal protective equipment, access to COVID-19 testing, and paid sick leave immediately and indefinitely. Farmworkers are finally identified as "essential"-it is time to start treating them like it.Edward W. Corty is a St. Petersburg native. He is a rising fourth-year medical student at Florida State University and will finish a Master of Public Health degree from Johns Hopkins University next month.A Pinellas long-term care center with one of the deadliest COVID-19 outbreaks in the state reported its 20th death on Monday.Freedom Square of Seminole Executive Director Michael Mason announced that the facility now has a total of 20 fatalities in memos sent this week to residents, families and employees of the retirement community. The memos don't say how many of the deaths are of residents and how many are of staff members.The Tampa Bay Times has confirmed 18 resident deaths and one employee death through medical examiner records, making a total of 19 deaths connected to Freedom Square's facilities. Retirement community officials did not respond to questions about the discrepancy.Freedom Square reported the grim milestone the same day Gov. Ron DeSantis began reopening the state, even as coronavirus deaths continued to climb. Statewide numbers released Tuesday showed the grimmest picture yet, with a record 113 fatalities reported, including 11 in the Tampa Bay region.Meantime, St. Mark Village in Palm Harbor reported its ninth death, CEO Doug Fresh said Tuesday. Fresh said he is also awaiting results for about 100 employees who were tested for the virus Monday via AdventHealth."That was late, but we're happy that we got it," Fresh said. "It's been a rough ride."

The latest death reports released by the Pinellas-Pasco Medical Examiner's Office show that two 98-year-olds succumbed to the virus.St. Mark resident Jean Vanniere died Friday at Mease Countryside Hospital. She tested positive for the virus on April 23 at the nursing home and was taken to the hospital the next day. Vanniere had a history of high blood pressure, peripheral vascular disease, atrial fibrillation and dementia.Freedom Square resident Avis Lilly died on Saturday in hospice care at the facility. He had shortness of breath and was tested for the virus April 24. The result came back negative. His condition worsened, and he was tested again Friday. That result was positive. Lilly had a history of high blood pressure and heart disease.The District 5 Medical Examiner's Office in Leesburg, which investigates deaths in Hernando County, released a report into the death of 67-year-old Marjorie Blackman, a nurse who worked at Freedom Square's Seminole Pavilion nursing home. That is where most of the cases were concentrated on the Freedom Square campus in Seminole.Blackman, of Spring Hill, tested positive for COVID-19 and died April 29 at Oak Hill Hospital in Brooksville, according to the report. Her cause of death was COVID-19 pneumonia, said medical examiner's director of operations Lindsey Bayer.Freedom Square employees can still get tested, Mason said in the memos. As of Tuesday, 37 showed positive results, 582 were negative and the results of 15 tests were still pending.· · ·As COVID-19 cases increase across Tampa Bay, so too have cases risen at local veterans hospitals and clinics.In federal veterans healthcare systems across Florida, "there has been a cumulative increase from May until today," said Mary Kay Rutan, on Wednesday. Rutan is the spokeswoman for the Veterans Affairs division that includes Florida.Charts on a U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs website show a spike in cases in the past month in both the Bay Pines VA Healthcare System in St. Petersburg and the Tampa veterans healthcare system, which includes the James A. Haley Veterans' Hospital. Spokespersons from the local systems refused to divulge the numbers of new cases in June without a formal records request.The national Veterans Affairs website tracks three categories of cases:

Active: Current COVID-19 patients, who are either hospitalized or quarantined at home.Convalescent: COVID-19 patients who are either post-hospital discharge or at least 14 days past their last positive COVID-19 test. This includes all recovered patients since March.And deaths.On July 1, Florida's six federal veterans healthcare systems reported a total of 722 active cases, with 1,661 cumulative cases and 41 deaths since March. Of the active cases, 649 were veterans. Other cases include employees, veteran-employees, active-duty military and others. These figures are included the state's tracking of COVID-19 cases.The Bay Pines system, which includes hospitals and clinics in Pinellas, Manatee, Lee, Collier, Charlotte, Sarasota, and Highlands counties, reported 149 active cases on July 1, with 305 cumulative cases and five deaths since late March. Of the active cases, 139 were veterans. This system also cares for veterans in Desoto, Hardee and Hillsborough counties.The Tampa system, which includes hospitals and clinics in Hillsborough, Hernando, Pasco, Polk and Citrus counties, reported 154 active cases on July 1, with 283 cumulative cases and five deaths since late March. Of the active cases, 137 were veterans.Florida's federal veterans healthcare systems have sufficient bed capacity, Rutan said, and have surge planning in place if they need to expand bed capacity. These centers will continue to monitor case rates in their local communities and evaluate the re-introduction of elective procedures, she added. The centers resumed some elective procedures in mid-May.Spokespersons from both Bay Pines and Haley wrote in emails that they "continue to adhere to pandemic precautions that were successful in the early months of slowing the spread of COVID-19."A patient from a nearby nursing home experiencing an outbreak was transferred to the Tampa facility, accounting for its one case in the on-campus nursing home, according to the facility's spokeswoman Shayna Rodriguez in an email Monday. The Bay Pines on-campus nursing home has reported no cases of COVID-19.Everyone entering either facility is screened for exposure to the coronavirus, including getting their temperatures checked, and they are required to wear a surgical mask. Visitors are allowed in only if necessary, such as those who have a medical power of attorney for a patient. Emergency rooms and inpatient wards at both facilities have been separated into COVID-19 and non-COVID-19 areas, according to the spokespersons.The Tampa hospital has kept an operational, refrigerated morgue trailer in its loading dock since April as part of its pandemic response plan, but has not used it, Rodriguez said.At a recent virtual town hall, Bay Pines officials said in a presentation slide they are "not currently testing asymptomatic veterans at this time, due to the capacity of testing supplies, processing limitations and the need to ensure adequacy for symptomatic and those identified as priority."Anna Hancock, spokeswoman for the facility, said on Tuesday that the facility has enough testing supplies. In an email, she noted that all patients, visitors and staff members who come to Bay Pines are tested if they demonstrate symptoms."We do not automatically test all veterans who come to our campus. However, we will test asymptomatic veterans if they screen positive per the criteria," she said. "Additionally, we test all veterans who are admitted to our facilities as in-patients and who are scheduled for procedures, such as surgery."Florida's seven state-run veterans homes operate separately from the federal system. As of June 29, nine residents of state-run veterans homes were hospitalized with COVID-19, according to Steve Murray, spokesman for the Florida Department of Veterans' Affairs.Four were from the Robert H. Jenkins Jr. Veterans' Domiciliary Home in Lake City, and five were from the Alexander "Sandy" Nininger State Veterans' Nursing Home in Pembroke Pines.Thirteen COVID-19 patients of the Pembroke Pines facility and one from the Lake City facility have died since March, many of whom were in hospice, he said, and all had co-morbidities.· · · For the last three weeks, hospitals throughout Florida have been rearranging beds, converting office space and conference rooms, and retrofitting free-standing emergency rooms to wage war on an enemy they never before contemplated: COVID-19.

They've gotten regulatory waivers to overcome the bureaucratic hurdles. Some have accelerated construction on planned spaces and wired empty buildings to get them open. They have created surge schedules, cross-training staff to handle the respiratory disease, and they have turned off the spigot of revenue that comes from a steady stream of elective surgeries.

As Florida prepares for a surge in seriously ill COVID-19 patients in the next two weeks, healthcare officials across the state say hospitals have plenty of room to handle more patients.

"Hospitals are tracking capacity pretty closely and some are using their own software and resources to come up with their own estimates,'' said Crystal Stickle, interim president of the Florida Hospital Association. "Everybody feels pretty good [that] they have the capacity right now."

Questions remain, they say, about the availability of ventilators, masks and other supplies needed to accommodate both patients and front-line workers as Florida braces for the worst days of the pandemic.

But underpinning their confidence is the state's inventory of bed space and a national model built on assumptions based on positive test results that, healthcare experts admit, is fraught with uncertainty because only a small fraction of Floridians have been tested for the virus, and the universe of potential cases remains unknown.

By Friday morning, 57% of the hospital beds in Florida were occupied, and 62% of the intensive care unit (ICU) beds were filled, according to data collected by the Agency for Health Care Administration.

But the estimates being used by Florida public health officials, developed by the Institute for Health Metrics and Evaluation at the University of Washington, have already changed significantly in the last week - moving the expected peak date from May 4 to April 21 when Florida hospitals will face the greatest demand from COVID-19 patients and as many as 242 people could die a day. That gave Florida officials less time to prepare.

"It just goes to show you how unpredictable this situation is,'' said Jared Moskowitz, director of the Florida Division of Emergency Management at a roundtable discussion with the Miami Chamber of Commerce on Thursday. "We could wake up tomorrow and it could change again."

That's what happened. On Friday, the Florida projection moved to April 26.

He compared the models to the spaghetti graphs as a hurricane approaches, warning that "people just need to be vigilant" maintain social distancing, and realize "we're not at the peak yet."

Hospital officials have been learning from the experience of hospitals primarily in Italy and New York, said Stickle, who represents more than 200 health systems in the state.

But as the disease often takes days and sometimes weeks before a patient becomes critically ill, the lull at many hospitals now is expected to become a flurry of activity - as has happened in New York, New Orleans and Detroit.

Paul Biddinger, director of the Emergency Preparedness Research, Evaluation & Practice program at Harvard T.H. Chan School of Public Health, said that the peak in hospitalization is expected to plateau for a week or two in most places.

But it will be followed with another, more critical peak, the need for ICU beds "because patients typically take a couple of days to get to the critical period."

The University of Washington model suggests Florida will need 1,547 ICU beds by April 24 and will have 1,695 available.

Bay and Lee counties had the lowest supply of ICU beds on Friday, according to the AHCA data, with only 12% and 9% of the bed space available.

Although information about treating critically ill patients is moving quickly based on observations from Italy and China, Biddinger said, "COVID causes a lot of unusual complications that we haven't really seen before in different infectious diseases."

For example, patients develop blood clots more easily, and they are seeing patients with kidney damage, which "may be related to fluid management and sometimes the disease,'' he said.

Ventilator needs

Although AHCA has released data on the number of ICU beds and has been tracking the state's ventilator capacity, it has refused to release its data and any projected shortage.

If there is a shortage of ventilators, Florida hospitals are preparing to convert anesthesia machines to ventilators, which will require anesthesiologists to manage, Stickle said.

"We're still trying to get additional ventilators to be prepared for a worst-case scenario,'' she said.

No hospital has said that it doesn't have the ventilators to mean its current patient count but, she said, " we haven't gotten to the surge, and that's where the state's procured resources will come into play."

Hospital officials in Miami-Dade, Broward and Palm Beach counties have a daily call to ensure they are sharing data and trends "to prepare for whatever the surge may look like,'' Stickle said.

The "unprecedented coordination" is happening between for-profit and not-for-profit hospitals, she said. Hospital systems "that on most days are friendly competitors have put that aside to come up with a game plan to handle this."

At Jackson Memorial in Miami, which has has 1,460 beds, 37% of its bed space is still available, according to state data.

"Things are under control and we have the capacity to deal with what the community is facing right now,'' said Matthew Pinzur, vice president and chief marketing officer for Jackson Health System. "We have ample capacity of beds and we have ample capacity in ventilators - only one-third in use right now and 40 percent are used by COVID patients." [story can end here for print]

Following the examples of other states, Florida ordered hospitals to cancel elective procedures, and that has freed up bed space and lowered patient counts. That has also allowed staff to be cross-trained and paired with others to increase the capacity.

"For example, a hospital may have one ICU nurse and is supporting them with non-ICU nurses,'' Stickle said.

Limited testing

Also adding strain is the restrictions on who is allowed to be given tests for COVID-19.

"The availability of testing in the community is still extremely, extremely limited,'' said Pinzur of Jackson Health. "We've had to prioritize who is symptomatic and who's at the highest risk."

Justin Senior, president of the Safety Net Hospitals of Florida, which represents the state's not-for-profit health systems, said that delays in testing were an early challenge for hospitals, particularly on the West Coast of Florida, and that tested their capacity.

Anyone who arrived in emergency rooms in respiratory distress would be kept in isolation as hospitals followed enhanced infection control protocols, but many of those patients ultimately tested negative.

Since then, "testing processes have improved and hospitals are gaining experience and sort of getting their sea legs under them,'' Senior said.

Some hospitals have developed procedures to do the testing on site, but only certain hospitals have the sophisticated equipment to do the tests, which can be labor intensive.

"It takes personnel, and they are having manpower issues,'' he said. "They can't work them 24 hours a day. They have had to be judicious about it."

In Southwest Florida, which has a large and vulnerable elderly population, emergency officials are watching patient counts closely, Senior said. "If resources need to be moved to that part of the state, they can adjust to the need hopefully in time."

Staffing for the surge is another issue challenging hospitals. State officials have waived regulations to allow out-of-state medical professionals to practice in Florida on an emergency basis but, Stickle said, that option "has been challenging because every other state has the same needs."

The Florida National Guard medical unit is prepared to assist but hospitals have primarily turned to relying on existing staff, including those who normally work at ambulatory surgical centers and physicians offices that do surgical procedures to supply the backup needed. Some hospitals are also working with staffing companies, Stickle said.

Supplying enough masks and personal protective equipment to staff as hospitals reach peak demand remains a challenge, however. The shortage has forced many hospitals to sterilize and reuse some of their masks and gowns, Stickle said.

"We have ample supplies of personal protective equipment,'' said Pinzur of Jackson Health, but staff continues to be anxious about it. "There is no clear idea what the right level of PPE is."

In the areas with the highest numbers of positive cases, Florida emergency operations officials are also setting up five pop-up field hospitals in the hardest hit areas.

The state is working with private contractors to set up and staff 250-bed field hospitals. One in Miami-Dade County is being built at the county fairgrounds in Tamiami Park. Others underway are planned for Fort Lauderdale, Lee County, Jacksonville and West Palm Beach.

Palm Beach County lags in testing but leads the state in the number of fatalities. The Medical Examiner's Office is so inundated with a backlog of cases, it has leased two 40-foot refrigerated containers to store bodies.

In Miami Beach, the convention center is being transformed into an emergency hospital with 400 general beds and 50 intensive-care beds for COVID-19 patients.

In less than two weeks, it will be staffed by 184 members of the Florida National Guard's medical team, including 10 physicians, 19 physician assistants, five case managers, five social workers, 25 medical clerks, 25 housekeepers, a patient transporter, 25 EMT technicians, two medical assistants, 50 paramedics, 16 registered nurses and one licensed infection preventionist.

Gov. Ron DeSantis said at a news conference in Jacksonville Friday that he hopes none of the overflow facilities ever need to be used.

Meanwhile, everyone is watching the models and the daily infection rates posted by the state on the Department of Health dashboard. As of Friday morning, there were 17,531 positive cases and 2,360 people hospitalized with COVID-19.

"If we can maintain that for 20-25 days, and the new infections start to drop, that's when we know we're at the peak,'' Senior said. "Hopefully we'll start to turn those numbers."Gov. Ron DeSantis has chastised the media for quoting public health modelers who predicted the state would run out of hospital bed space if he didn't issue a state-wide stay-home order in April. But the governor's emergency managers, using those same models, were so concerned they would run out of space that they signed $283 million in no-bid deals to build alternative hospitals to hold the overflow, a Times/Herald analysis has found.One of those hospitals, the now-shuttered Pan American Hospital near the Miami airport, received the heftiest of the offers: a $42 million-a-month agreement to repair, lease and operate a 200-bed facility to house COVID-19 patients. The deal to use Children & Family Hospital, as it was being called, was brokered by Alex Heckler, a Miami lawyer who is a Democratic Party operative and close friend of Division of Emergency Management Director Jared Moskowitz.The purchase order was signed in late March with Nicklaus Children's Hospital, which owns the property known as the Miami Medical Center that is for sale.

The state spent $3.2 million in emergency funds to make repairs to the building and pay its taxes, but the hospital was never used, and the initial purchase order was canceled in mid-April after the governor signed a stay-home order.Now, the deal is being revived to house COVID-19 patients as Florida health officials are considering using it to place residents of nursing homes and assisted living facilities who have tested positive for the virus but do not need full hospital care. The Agency for Health Care Administration confirmed Tuesday it would offer a no-bid contract to a willing provider who will be given a license to operate the hospital as a nursing home. A decision is expected this week.The prospect of using a broker to lease Children & Family Hospital of South Florida stands as another example of the role relationships played as the DeSantis administration dished out millions in emergency funds in March and April as it privately prepared for a projected influx of COVID-19 patients while publicly denying the epidemic in Florida was widespread.The Times/Herald reviewed publicly available purchase orders and contracts to analyze the data. Department of Emergency Management officials would not release documents that show how much Heckler's firm made off the deal, but his client was SLSCO, a Galveston, Texas-based general contractor and affiliate of Sullivan Interests, a company run by brothers Todd, William and John Sullivan.

Well-connected representatives

SLSCO is represented in Tallahassee by Cissy Proctor, Heckler's partner and the former head of the Division of Economic Opportunity during the Rick Scott administration. She, Heckler, and former state Rep. Marcello Llorente are principals in their lobbying firm LSN Partners.SLSCO is also the subcontractor for Aptim Environmental, which won a state "emergency standby material and services contract" on March 2 to provide base camps and emergency shelters during the 2020 hurricane season. The contract was expected to be completed in May, but state officials quickly signed it in March so they could have a stable of contracts to turn to for emergency supplies as the coronavirus became more menacing."Pre-disaster contracts for logistics vendors were executed in order to save taxpayer dollars while also enabling Florida to respond quickly to any emergency,'' said Jason Mahon, spokesman for the Department of Emergency Management. "Through this process, prices were competitively bid on over 1,000 items, which would otherwise have a higher cost during an emergency when supplies are short. By having these contracts in place, the state was able to develop a quick and thorough response to COVID-19, and enabled the division to execute the largest logistics operation in state history."Although Heckler represented one of the subcontractors, Moskowitz "did not take part in the evaluation of any proposals,'' Mahon said. The agreements signed for the emergency hospitals "in response to COVID-19 were divided between these pre-event vendors,'' he said.Although Aptim and SLSCO received the largest single contract, which appears as purchase orders totaling $84 million for two months, the state also turned to two other logistics companies to build field hospitals that have since also been canceled.According to the Times/Herald analysis, purchase orders totaling at least $47 million were signed with Garner Environmental Services for staffing and services at the emergency hospital built in the Miami Beach Convention Center. Louis Berger, an engineering firm, received purchase orders totaling at least $2.6 million for a Jacksonville field hospital. Purchase orders totaling $30 million for medical facilities were also signed with CDR Maguire, a transportation firm. And Aptim Corp. was also given the bid to handle building a facility at the Miami Youth Fairgrounds.None of the facilities have been used as hospitals because the surge in demand for hospital beds in Florida didn't materialize.

Social distancing started at home

Data now shows that while DeSantis was slow to halt business activity, Floridians mostly on their own had slowed their interactions and travel weeks before. When hospitals halted elective surgeries and reconfigured their bed space to accommodate the anticipated surge in COVID-19 patients, the extra space wasn't needed.DeSantis has repeatedly criticized the media for quoting models that predicted that if the state continued on the then-current course without social distancing and stay-home orders, little isolation and testing, the virus would have exploded in Florida, overwhelming hospitals.The projections from the University of Washington's Institute for Health Metrics and Evaluation that were reported by the Times/Herald and other news organizations were used by President Donald Trump's administration in developing national guidelines to mitigate the coronavirus outbreak. The governor and his staff put their focus on how to handle patients who became infected with the deadly virus, while downplaying talk of how to prevent it through social distancing.Meanwhile, they were watching closely what was happening in New York as hospitals maxed out bed space, and they feared Florida could face the same fate.Records of the state's vendor list show that by mid March, state emergency managers were using the governor's executive order which allowed it to deficit spend to buy nasal swabs, gowns, masks, boot covers and ventilators. By the first week of May, they had signed at least 763 purchase orders.They also signed contracts for hospitals. According to the background provided to the state by SLSCO and obtained by theTimes/Herald, it has no experience developing and managing hospitals but has deep experience in housing construction in emergencies. It also was awarded a $789 million contract by the Army Corps of Engineers to build the border wall.

Getting vacant facility ready

Nicklaus Children's Hospital confirmed that it "offered the site formerly known as The Miami Medical Center for lease as part of the regional response to provide care for anticipated COVID-19 surge patients" but that while it owns the property, "it is not involved in the operation of the facility."That task was assigned to SLSCO. Its proposal to the state showed that it offered to supply all medical equipment and personnel to staff the hospital by subcontracting with a doctors group, initially expected to be a group called CHS. The cost of travel to Florida for medical staff would be billed at the cost plus 18%, as would any fuel or utilities for an estimated monthly total of $15.8 million.Estimated monthly cost of medical equipment and staffing was $13.9 million. Nicklaus Children's Hospital would receive monthly rent of $150,000 to cover taxes and utilities.The plans were vetted and approved by FEMA, said Mahon, the Division of Emergency Management spokesman, "and all costs associated with bringing this hospital online will be sent to FEMA for reimbursement."Now, the contract with DEM is being considered for use by the Agency for Health Care Administration, which regulates nursing homes."The agency and DEM have been in conversations on how to best utilize this established alternative care site to support the appropriate isolation and care of COVID-positive long-term care residents in the Miami-Dade area,'' said Katie Strickland, spokeswoman for AHCA.She said the state would "quickly license the facility operator and enroll a provider in Medicaid if necessary, and neither of these processes involve competitive bids."The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention has been sharing strategies with the public to stay safe during the COVID-19 pandemic. The agency also has advice for those affected by hurricane season.Whether you have to evacuate or plan to hunker down at home, here are some tips to help keep your household safe this hurricane season:

Before the storm

Understand that your planning may be different this year because of the need to protect yourself and others from COVID-19.Give yourself more time than usual to prepare your emergency food, water, and medical supplies. Home delivery is the safest choice for buying disaster supplies. If in-person shopping is your only choice, take steps to protect your and others' health when running essential errands.Protect yourself and others when filling prescriptions by limiting in-person visits to the pharmacy. Sign up for mail-order delivery or call in your prescription ahead of time and use drive-through windows or curbside pickup, if available.Pay attention to local guidance about updated plans for evacuations and shelters, including potential shelters for your pets.If you need to evacuate, prepare a "go kit" with personal items you cannot do without during an emergency. Include items that can help protect you and others from COVID-19, such as hand sanitizer, or bar or liquid soap if not available, and two cloth face coverings for each person. Face covers should not be used by children under the age of 2. They also should not be used by people having trouble breathing, or who are unconscious, incapacitated, or unable to remove the mask without assistance.When you check on neighbors and friends, be sure to follow social distancing recommendations (staying at least 6 feet, about 2 arms' length, from others) and other CDC recommendations to protect yourself and others.If you need to go to a disaster shelter, follow the Centers for Disease Control's recommendations for staying safe and healthy in a public disaster shelter during the COVID-19 pandemic.

After the storm

The risks don't end after a hurricane passes by:You should continue to use preventive actions like washing your hands and wearing a face covering during cleanup or when returning home.It may take longer than usual to restore power and water if they are out. Take steps to prevent carbon monoxide poisoning if you use a generator.If you are injured or ill, contact your medical provider for treatment recommendations. Keep wounds clean to prevent infection. Remember, accessing medical care may be more difficult than usual during the pandemic.Dealing with disasters can cause stress and strong emotions, particularly during the COVID-19 pandemic. It is natural to feel anxiety, grief and worry. Coping with these feelings and getting help when you need it will help you, your family and your community recover.People with pre-existing mental health conditions should continue with their treatment and be aware of new or worsening symptoms. Additional information can be found at the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration(https://www.samhsa.gov/disaster-preparedness) page.After testing positive for COVID-19, Dr. Maria Finazzo wanted to help others in Florida who fell ill from the disease.Finazzo, a radiologist from Sarasota, drove to the Raymond James Stadium testing site in Tampa after she and her husband began displaying symptoms in mid-March. Nearly two weeks later, the results revealed she was positive.Once she recovered, Finazzo researched how she could donate her antibodies through plasma."We had a friend who was very ill and I asked some fellow physicians how I could help," she said. "I donated plasma at a local blood bank, and it can be used for anyone who is a potential match to my blood type and needs help."Antibody tests, which detect signs of infection in blood, have been touted by political leaders as a promising alternative to the more traditional nasal and throat swab tests that have bogged down efforts to fight the virus. Long delays and shortages in collection and swab materials have severely limited the number of people who have been tested so far.But as antibody tests are slowly being rolled out in labs across Tampa Bay and the nation, doctors say they come with their own set of problems."This area is sort of the wild West right now," said Dr. Kami Kim, a professor of infectious disease at the University of South Florida.More than 90 antibody tests for COVID-19 are on the market after the Food and Drug Administration loosened restrictions, allowing companies to produce and sell them without being scientifically reviewed."When COVID-19 testing first came out, the FDA was too controlled, so they've now erred on the other side and have swung too far in the other direction," Kim said. "There are a lot of tests out there and it's not really clear what the quality of the tests are."

Tampa General Hospital began antibody testing in its laboratory just this week, said Dr. Charles Lockwood, dean of the Morsani College of Medicine at the University of South Florida. The hospital will test all 3,000 of its health care workers this way, hoping to keep them safe by identifying who has been exposed to the virus.BayCare Health System has also begun to run antibody tests in its labs, said Dr. Nishant Anand, chief medical officer. But it remains unclear how local hospitals will use these tests in the long term."The market is flooded with all different companies offering tests, and the accuracy and validity of those tests are not reliable," Anand said.The tests can be used to determine if a person's immune cells are producing antibodies, which are part of the body's response to a virus, working to prevent it from spreading. Their presence means a person has been exposed to infection.But the tests technically cannot diagnose the COVID-19 disease, experts say, because antibodies can come from a variety of coronavirus strains, including the common cold, making the results difficult to discern."It's possible someone can get a false positive," Kim said. "We still have to work out in what context these tests will be the most useful. Some of these things have not been clarified yet."However, they can be useful for public health surveillance, data gathering and vaccine development in the long term.The Infectious Disease Society of America issued a statement last week warning practitioners that there are "there are multiple issues that need to be addressed" for antibody testing, "from test quality to interpretation.""The current antibody testing landscape is varied and clinically unverified, and these tests should not be used as the sole test for diagnostic decisions," the statement said.Similarly, the World Health Organization cautioned against plans for "immunity passports" that would allow people with COVID-19 antibodies to escape social distancing restrictions. It also discouraged politicians and public health officials from allowing patients who have recovered from the coronavirus to return to work or travel freely.Antibody tests are generally used to monitor infections like HIV or confirm vaccinations. Blood samples are run in a laboratory to confirm the result, or sometimes, a test result can be read in minutes if it's a "rapid test," similar to a pregnancy test. Scientists still know too little about the role antibodies play in immunity for the coronavirus, Anand said."The biggest value these tests offer right now is from a public health standpoint. It can help us determine how widespread the disease really is," he said.Another way BayCare is using antibodies is by taking "convalescent plasma" donations from recovered patients, like Finazzo from Sarasota, and infusing them in ill patients to help them get better, Anand said."The first step is really validating an accurate test," he said. "And the next is determining which method is most beneficial. There is still a lot to be determined."BayCare will continue to test and monitor the results for now, he added.In early March, Finazzo and her husband, Michael, had traveled to Denver with their son. When they returned, both she and her husband began to feel sick with a fever and sore throat. Her husband was so sick that he couldn't get out of bed for a week."I remember being surprised, but relieved in a way, once I got the positive test result," she said. "At least I knew. And I had the ability to help others. It's very easy to donate plasma."· · ·For the first time in 29 days, the Florida Department of Health did not report any new COVID-19 deaths in the seven counties that make up the Tampa Bay region. As Memorial Day weekend drew scores of people to Tampa Bay beaches, the Florida Department of Health announced 740 new positive cases of coronavirus and four more deaths Sunday. The overall number of coronavirus cases in Florida jumped to to 50,867. State health officials have attributed 2,316 deaths to COVID-19 in the 12 weeks that have passed since health officials announced Florida's first known coronavirus cases on March 1.According to the Florida Department of Health, roughly six percent of the nearly 873,000 people tested across the state have been positive for the coronavirus. That's about four percent of the state's population.

How fast is the number of Florida COVID-19 cases growing?Morning updates typically show low numbers for the current day.What's the latest statewide?The number of new cases added to the state's total every day doesn't always reflect the number of cases discovered or confirmed in any given day, state officials said. Large batches of results like the 740 new cases reported Sunday morning often include data from multiple days of testing. And the state's reported data often changes retroactively as health officials receive more information on each case.In anticipation of Memorial Day weekend, Gov. Ron DeSantis eased restrictions on vacation rentals in 42 of the state's 67 counties. DeSantis also announced plans on Friday to lift restrictions on all youth activities across the state, including summer camps and sports. Instead, DeSantis said he'll leave it up to local governments to impose their own restrictions as they see fit.But while Sunday's four reported fatalities falls short of the average seven deaths recorded each day, the daily report also noted a spike in patients hospitalized for worsening symptoms. As of Sunday morning, an additional 71 coronavirus patients have been hospitalized, raising the statewide total to 9,381.Two of Sunday's four reported deaths were in Miami-Dade County, ground zero for Florida's wave of coronavirus infections where 641 people have died and the total number of cases has risen to 16,845.The other two coronavirus-related deaths reported on Sunday occurred in Volusia and Walton counties, state records show.Is Florida's coronavirus outbreak still growing?What's the latest in Tampa Bay?There were 131 positive cases reported in Tampa Bay on Sunday, bringing the region's total case load to 5,477.Hillsborough County continues to lead the area with 1,883 people who have tested positive for the virus - 60 of which were added over the past 24 hours. The City of Tampa is ranked seventh in the state for the most positive cases with 1,199. Hillsborough has reported 75 coronavirus-related deaths countywide, state records show, two of which were reported Saturday morning.Pinellas has 1,173 coronavirus cases and 76 deaths; Manatee has 975 cases and 93 deaths; Polk has 869 cases and 49 deaths; Pasco has 349 cases and 13 deaths; Citrus has 119 cases and 12 deaths; and Hernando has 109 cases and 6 deaths.What are the latest numbers on coronavirus in Tampa Bay?What's the latest in long-term care centers?The number of coronavirus-related deaths among residents and staff inside Florida's nursing homes and assisted living facilities rose to 1,076 - which is roughly 46 percent of all deaths reported statewide and 61 percent of all coronavirus-related deaths reported in the Tampa Bay area.Statewide, the Florida Department of Health reports 8,242 positive coronavirus cases in these long-term care facilities, about 17 percent of all cases. Nursing homes in the Tampa Bay area have accounted for 200 deaths, with the highest concentration coming from Manatee County.Experts and advocates agree that frequently testing all staffers and residents for the virus is the only way to prevent it from further decimating Florida's nursing homes. Still, Gov. Ron DeSantis has stalled, saying Florida doesn't have the resources available for a massive testing rollout.Doctors say older people are at a greater risk to developing severe symptoms from COVID-19, which makes Florida especially vulnerable.Florida coronavirus cases by age groupDoctors say older people are at a greater risk to developing severe symptoms from COVID-19, which makes Florida especially vulnerable.· · ·Dr. Anthony Fauci, a leading infectious disease expert on the federal Coronavirus Task Force, plainly stated on Tuesday that Florida is one of four states with "community spread" of the disease and therefore elevated risk.

"What we're saying today is that although we keep coming in and saying appropriately that as a nation the risk is relatively low, there are parts of the country right now that are having community spread in which the risk there is clearly a bit more than that," Fauci said. "And you know the places: Washington state, California, New York and Florida."

But here in Florida, state officials in Gov. Ron Desantis' office directly contradicted Fauci.

When asked about the doctor's assertion of community spread, governor's spokeswoman Helen Ferré provided this statement to the Times/Herald: "As Governor DeSantis stated (Monday), there is no community spread of COVID-19 in Florida at this time."

On Monday, the governor had said multiple cases of coronavirus in Broward County tied to a cruise services company at Port Everglades were not evidence of community spread. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention defines community spread as: "People have been infected with the virus in an area, including some who are not sure how or where they became infected."

In Florida, the majority of the 15 people in the state who have tested positive for coronavirus traveled overseas. But four patients in Broward and a Manatee County man each have no history of visiting places where there have been outbreaks of coronavirus internationally, according to the Florida Department of Health.

"According to the CDC, community spread means people have been randomly infected with the virus in an area where there is uncertainty as to how or where they became infected," Ferré said Tuesday when asked about the discrepancy. "In Broward County, the three workers at the port work for the same company, in the same location, and tested positive for COVID-19."

How the first of those three people came in contact with the virus has not been made known if, indeed, public health officials have that information.

The state has not said publicly how the Manatee man might have contracted coronavirus.

The distinction is not just a matter of semantics.

"When you have community spread you're obviously going to ratchet up the kinds of mitigations that you have," said Fauci.

There are still unanswered questions about people who tested positive for COVID-19 despite not having any known travel history to affected areas.

One day after health officials announced Florida's first two "presumptive positive" COVID-19 results, they went on a press tour from the state's west coast to Miami-Dade.

On the fourth floor of the county's Department of Health building, DeSantis shared details about a Manatee County man in his 60s who tested positive for the virus despite having no known travel history to affected areas at the time.

DeSantis said the man had "a lot of underlying health conditions" and was in contact with several healthcare professionals before his diagnosis, raising concerns about the staff of Doctors Hospital of Sarasota, where the patient was being cared for when he tested positive.

On the same press tour, State Surgeon General Scott Rivkees startled reporters when he said the Manatee County man was hospitalized for five days before he was first tested for COVID-19. The state has said the man wasn't eligible for testing until the CDC updated its criteria.

Ferré said fears of community spread in Broward County are unfounded since the patients work for the same company in the same location, therefore deeming it not random.

So why would Fauci refer to Florida when talking about community spread?

"That is a question for Dr. Fauci and (the Centers for Disease Control)," Ferré said.

Fauci is director of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases. He was first appointed to the role in 1984 and has worked with six presidents. He's widely known for his contributions in HIV/AIDS research. He received the Presidential Medal of Freedom in 2008 from Pres. George W. Bush.

Two coronavirus patients, a man from Santa Rosa County and a woman from Lee County, both in their 70s, have died. Doctors believe young and healthy people withstand coronavirus fairly well, but elderly people and those with existing medical trouble are more vulnerable.

The latest cases announced by the state are a 60-year-old Volusia County woman who has traveled internationally and a 69-year-old Broward County woman who has not recently been abroad.Amid heightened fears over the spread of the coronavirus throughout densely populated South Florida, a large Fort Lauderale assisted living facility - a home to the virus' most vulnerable demographic group - has become a worrisome hot spot.

Administrators at the 180-bed Atria Willow Wood ALF informed residents and their loved ones Friday that a second resident of the home had died from COVID-19, the disease cause by the extremely contagious respiratory infection that has spurred a pandemic. The second death linked to the virus appears to be of a 93-year-old man whose test for the disease initially was reported to be negative.

On Sunday, 77-year-old Richard Curren became the first to succumb to the disease. Curren's daughter, Tracy Curren Wieder, said Curren had been hospitalized a week ago Friday when his respiratory illness failed to improve. He suffered a cardiac arrest at Holy Cross Hospital last Sunday and could not be revived. Wieder said she was told her father had tested positive for COVID-19.

In an email to family members, Atria Senior Living's senior vice president, Yunia Gonzelez, said five other residents of the home are hospitalized, and "have tested positive for COVID-19." Gonzelez said administrators at the home, at 2855 W. Commercial Blvd., were "waiting on the test result" for six other residents.

Among them may be a person who was transported from the facility Wednesday by paramedics wearing protective equipment. It was unclear at the time whether that person was a resident or an employee.

"We remain in close coordination with the [state] Department of Health throughout the day," Gonzelez added. "We continue to take all necessary precautions as advised by health officials."

The virus' particular danger to older people has been a hallmark of its advance: In Kirkland, Wash., a suburb of Seattle, 26 people died at the Life Care Center nursing home - 13 of whom tested positive for COVID-19.

There are 691 licensed nursing homes in Florida, representing about 84,448 beds - and another 3,080 licensed ALFs, representing about 106,103 beds.

At a news conference Wednesday, the head of Florida's Agency for Health Care Administration, Mary Mayhew, said 19 long-term care facilities have either suspected or confirmed cases of the virus. State leaders have not provided more recent information.

Lacking evidence that the virus had taken hold at Willow Wood, authorities were at first reluctant to raise too many concerns at the Fort Lauderdale home, as frail and medically compromised elders die at long-term care facilities in the normal course of events.

"This terrible tragedy is yet another reminder of how important it is for us to maintain our vigilance against the spread of this disease," said Fort Lauderdale Mayor Dean Trantalis.

"The inconvenience of the restrictions in our day-to-day activities is but a small sacrifice to pay in order to save lives," Trantalis added. "Our community has come together unlike any other time in our history. It's a proud moment for all of us to share."







